DI-79

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
CIRCUIT INSPECTION '
DTC |co0200/3 1-C1239/39 | Speed Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

N

Speed Sensor
) Magnet

Coil

Low Speed

High Speed

The speed sensor detects wheel speed and sends the ap-
propriate signals to the ECU. These signals are used for control
ofboththe ABS & BA & VSC control system. The frontandrear
rotors each have 48 serrations.

Whentherotors rotate, the magnetic field emitted by the perma-
nent magnet in the speed sensor generates AC voltage. Since
the frequency of this AC voltage changes in direct proportion to
the speed of the rotor, the frequency is used by the ECU to de-
tect the speed of each wheel.

e Y
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Detection of any ofthe conditions  1.through4.:
1.Atavehiclespeedof = 10km/h (6 mph) ormore, pulses
arenotinputfor 15sec.
2. Momentary interruption of the speed sensor signal oc-
curs at least 7 times in the time between switching the
ignition switch ON and switching it OFF.
3. Continuous noise occurs into the speed sensor signals
C0200/3 1 withavehicle speed at20 km/h ( 12mph) ormore.
C0205/ 32 4. The conditionthatthe speed sensor signal circuitis « Rightfront, leftfront, rightrear and leftrear speed sensor
C0210/33 opencontinuesfor0. 12sec.ormore. » Each speed sensor circuit
C0215/34 * ABSdoes nqtfunctlon * Sensorrotor
* Brake pedalis notdepressed
¢ Parking brake is not set
* Rear differential does notlock
Under the above conditions, when the difference in velocity
between the highest rotating and the second highest rotat-
ingwheelsiswithin2km/h( 1.2mph), the slowestwheel
rotates at 0 km/h (0 mph), and the second slowest wheel
rotatesat 12km/h (7.5mph)for 1 secondormore.
C1235/35 ) ) )
C1236/36 C-ontlnuo.us noise (?ccurs into the speed sensor « Rightfront, leftfront, rightrear, left rear speed sensor
C1238/38 sngnalswnhthevehlcle speedat20km/h ( 12mph)  Speed sensor rotor
C1239/39 or more continues for 5 sec or more.
HINT:

. DTCNo.C0200/3
. DTCNo.C0205/32andC

. DTCNo.C02 10/33andC
. DTCNo.C02 15/34andC
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1 and C 1235/35 arefortherightfrontspeed sensor.
1236/36 are fortheleftfront speed sensor.
1238/38 arefortherightrear speed sensor.
1239/39 arefortheleftrear speed sensor.
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*2: Independent Suspension
*3: Rigid Axle Suspension

*1: Shielded
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*3: Right Axle Suspension
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DI-82 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1 incaseofusingthehand -heldtesterand startfromstep2incase of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Checkoutput value of speed sensor.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switchtothe ON position and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Check that there is no difference between the speed value output from the speed sensor displayed on the
hand-heldtesterandthe speedvalue displayed onthe speedometer when driving the vehicle.
OK:
There is almost no difference from the displayed speed value.
HINT:
Thereistoleranceof + 10% inthe speedometerindication.

@

2 | Check speed sensor.

OK> Check and replace skid control ECU.

Front:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make surethatthereis nolooseness atthe connector’s
locking part and connecting part of the connector.
(o) Disconnect the speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
. LH side:
Measure resistance between terminals 2 and 4 of the
speed sensor connector.
. RHside:
Measureresistance betweenterminals 1 and2ofthe
speed sensor connector.

F04508 Resistance:0.92to0 1.22k Q
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CHECK:
S LH side:
Measure resistance between terminals 2 and 4 of the
speed sensor connector and body ground.
S RH side:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of the
speed sensor connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 10 kS or higher
Rear:
PREPARATION:
(@) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector
locking part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect the speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of the speed
sensor connector.
OK:
Resistance: 1.0 to 1.4 kQ
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of the speed sen-
sor connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 10 kQ or higher

NG> Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal after replacement
(see Pub. No. RM970E, page DI-185)

3 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each speed
sensor and ECU (See page IN-38).

Iiiill
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NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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4 Check sensor installation.

CHECK:
N Check the speed sensor installation.

N OoK:

N \ The installation bolt is tightened properly and there is
\ % no clearance between the sensor and front steering
§ N knuckle or rear axle shaft.

w—
OK NG
BR3795

NG> Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal after replacement
(see Pub. No. RM970E, page DI-185)
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-85

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

5 [ Check speed sensor and sensor rotor serrations.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

Normal Signal Waveform

[\
d/\\/A\J/\\/ A

2 m/s / Division
1V /Division

GND

W04200
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PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the skid control ECU.

(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals FR+,
FL+, RR+ or RL+ and GND of the skid control ECU.

CHECK:

Drive the vehicle at about 20 km/h (12 mph), and check the sig-

nal waveform.

OK:

A waveform as shown in a figure should be output.

HINT:

S Asthe vehicle speed (wheel revolution speed) increases,
a cycle of waveform narrows and the fluctuation in output
voltage becomes greater.

S When noise is identified in the waveform on the oscillo-
scope, error signals are generated due to the speed sen-
sor rotors scratches, looseness or foreign matter on it.

OK> Check and replace skid control ECU.
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6 [ Check sensor rotor and sensor tip.

RO7880

F04443

OK

Front:
PREPARATION:
Remove the front axle hub (see Pub No. RM616E, page
SA-21).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:
No scratches, missing teeth or foreign matter.
PREPARATION:
Remove the front speed sensor (see Pub No. RM616E, page
BR-89).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:
No scratches or foreign matter on the sensor tip.

Rear:
PREPARATION:
Remove the rear axle shaft (see Pub No. RM616E, page
SA-161).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:
No scratches, missing teeth or foreign matter.
PREPARATION:
Remove the rear speed sensor (see Pub No. RM616E, page
BR-92).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:
No scratches or foreign matter on the sensor tip.

NG> Replace speed sensor or rotor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal after replacement
(see Pub. No. RM970E, page DI-185)

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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